District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1944

Double salaries — School teachers and employees in District.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 6, 1917, 40 Stat. 384, ch. 79, § 9
July 8, 1918, 40 Stat. 823, ch. 139,§ 1
June 5, 1920, 41 Stat. 1017, ch. 253, § 1
Aug. 19, 1964, 78 Stat. 491, 493, Pub. L. 88-448, title IV, §§ 401(i), 402(a)(17), (18)
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78, § 15, 29 DCR 49

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1009.
1973 Ed., § 31-631.